Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.535

Withdrawal deemed on conversion to domestic entity.

A registered foreign entity that converts to any type of domestic entity is deemed to have withdrawn its registration on the effective date of the conversion.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1508.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.